Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.025

Financial institutions—Loan charges—Out-of-state national banks.

Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, requirements, or other provisions of law, a financial institution, as defined in RCW 30A.22.040(8), may charge, take, receive, or reserve interest, discount or other points, finance charges, or other similar charges on any loan or other extension of credit, at a rate or amount that is equal to, or less than, the maximum rate or amount of interest, discount or other points, finance charges, or other similar charges that national banks located in any other state or states may charge, take, receive, or reserve, under 12 U.S.C. Sec. 85, on loans or other extensions of credit to residents of this state. However, this section does not authorize any subsidiary of a bank, of a savings bank, of a savings and loan association, or of a credit union to charge, take, receive, or reserve interest, discount or other points, finance charges, or other similar charges on any loan or other extension of credit, unless the subsidiary is itself a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union.

[ 2014 c 37 s 104; 2003 c 24 s 3. Formerly RCW 30.04.025.]